Tennessee statutes. Title 31 Descent And Distribution
Chapter 5

Advancements

31-5-101. Equality in dividing estates.

If an individual dies intestate as to all or a portion of the individual's estate, property the decedent gave during the decedent's lifetime to a child of the decedent is treated as an advancement against the child's intestate share only if:

The decedent declared in a contemporaneous writing, or the child acknowledged in writing, that the gift is an advancement; or

The decedent's contemporaneous writing or the child's written acknowledgment otherwise indicates that the gift is to be taken into account in computing the division and distribution of the decedent's intestate estate.

For purposes of subsection (a), property advanced is valued as of the time the child came into possession or enjoyment of the property or as of the time of the decedent's death, whichever first occurs.

If the recipient of the property fails to survive the decedent, the property is not taken into account in computing the division and distribution of the decedent's intestate estate, unless the decedent's contemporaneous writing provides otherwise.

The further provisions of this chapter concerning collation of property shall apply only if there has been an advancement as determined in accordance with subsection (a).

Code 1858, § 2431 (deriv. Acts 1766, ch. 3, § 1; 1784 (Apr.), ch. 22, § 2; 1829, ch. 36, § 1); Shan., § 4174; Code 1932, § 8402; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 31-701; Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 26 provided that the amendments to this section by that act shall apply to all estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 1998 and to all wills, other documents and proceedings related thereto.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 819.

Law Reviews.

Concealing Legislative Reform in the Common-Law Tradition: The Advancements Doctrine and the Uniform Probate Code (Mary L. Fellows), 37 Vand. L. Rev. 671 (1984).

The Doctrine of Advancements, 17 Tenn. L. Rev. 254 (1943).

The Doctrine of Advancements in Tennessee (Stephanie W. Harris), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 763 (1983).

31-5-102. Collation of advancements generally.

All advancements, whether by settlement or otherwise, in the lifetime of deceased, or by testamentary provision, shall be collated and brought into contribution in the partition and distribution of the real and personal estate of the deceased; those in real estate, first in the partition of real estate, and those in personal estate in the distribution of the personal estate.

Code 1858, § 2432 (deriv. Acts 1839-1840, ch. 48, § 1); Shan., § 4175; Code 1932, § 8402a; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 31-702.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 819, 820.

Law Reviews.

Concealing Legislative Reform in the Common-Law Tradition: The Advancements Doctrine and the Uniform Probate Code (Mary L. Fellows), 37 Vand. L. Rev. 671 (1984).

The Doctrine of Advancements, 17 Tenn. L. Rev. 254 (1943).

The Doctrine of Advancements in Tennessee (Stephanie W. Harris), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 763 (1983).

Wills, Trusts and Estates (Herein of Future Interests) — 1956 Tennessee Survey (W. J. Bowe), 9 Vand. L. Rev. 1157 (1956).

31-5-103. Collation of excess over share.

Should the value of the advancements in real estate exceed the child's share, the overplus shall be collated and brought into contribution in the distribution of the personal estate, and should the value of the advancements in personal estate exceed the share of the child in the personal estate, then the excess shall be brought into contribution in the partition of the real estate.

Code 1858, § 2433 (deriv. Acts 1839-1840, ch. 48, § 2); Shan., § 4176; Code 1932, § 8403; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 31-703.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 819, 823.

Collateral References.

Recovery of excess of advancement over distributable share in estate. 46 A.L.R. 1428.

31-5-104. Collation of property settled on child under power or trust.

Where a power or trust is granted to a parent to bestow property conveyed or settled by the instrument creating the power or trust, in favor of any one or more of the children of the parent, any property given under the power or trust to a child shall be collated and brought into contribution by the child claiming a share in the distribution of the property of the parent.

Code 1858, § 2434 (deriv. Acts 1839-1840, ch. 48, § 3); Shan., § 4177; Code 1932, § 8404; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 31-704.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 819, 820.

31-5-105. Jurisdiction of distribution.

All courts having jurisdiction to partition real estate and order distribution among heirs and distributees, shall have full power to cause accounts to be taken and valuations of lands to be made, so as to enforce equality of partition and distribution.

Code 1858, § 2435 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 36, § 2); Shan., § 4178; Code 1932, § 8405; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 31-705.

Cross-References. Partition generally, title 29, ch. 27.

Partition or sale of property in chancery court, § 16-11-111.

Probate jurisdiction transferred from county court to chancery court, title 16, ch. 16, part 2.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 823.